Nebraska, session 109, LB150A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $146,056 from federal funds
for FY2025-26 and (2) $147,609 from federal funds for FY2026-27 to the Nebraska
Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice, for Program 155, to aid in
carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 150, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $97,078 for FY2025-26 or
$101,932 for FY2026-27.
-1-